Oklahoma, session 2025, SB703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-154.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 6-154.1. A. The State Board of Education shall


promulgate rules by which a person who holds a valid Oklahoma


Standard Teaching Certificate standard teaching certificate may


satisfy requirements for renewal of the Standard Teaching


Certificate standard teaching certificate by completing staff


development programs, a micro-credential, conferences, and seminars


in lieu of teaching experience or higher education credits required


by the State Board of Education for certificate renewal. Only

Req. No. 1449 Page 1


programs, micro-credentials, conferences, and seminars recognized


for staff development credit by an Oklahoma a public school district


in this state at the time the teacher attends the program,


conference, or seminar or completes the micro-credential may be used


to fulfill requirements under this section. The State Board of


Education shall not require more staff development credit to be


earned for certificate renewal than the Board requires teachers and


administrators to earn pursuant to Section 6-158 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The State Department of Education, in collaboration with the


Office of Educational Quality and Accountability, shall identify


micro-credentials that may be used to fulfill the renewal


requirements provided for in subsection A of this section. Micro-


credentials identified pursuant to this subsection may be provided


by institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State System


of Higher Education and providers and digital learning platforms


approved by the Department.


C. District School district boards of education may charge a


reasonable fee for a holder of a valid Oklahoma Standard Teaching


Certificate standard teaching certificate who is not employed as a


teacher or administrator in an Oklahoma a public school in this


state to attend district-sponsored staff development programs or


seminars.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 1449 Page 2


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1449 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:41 AM





































Req. No. 1449 Page 3